Utah statutes.
31A-23b-205.   Examination and training requirements.

(1)  The commissioner may require applicants for a license to pass an examination and complete a training program as a requirement for a license.

(2)  The examination described in Subsection (1) shall reasonably relate to:

(a)  the duties and functions of a navigator;

(b)  requirements for navigators as established by federal regulation under PPACA; and

(c)  other requirements that may be established by the commissioner by administrative rule.

(3)  The examination may be administered by the commissioner or as otherwise specified by administrative rule.

(4)  The training required by Subsection (1) shall be approved by the commissioner and shall include:

(a)  accident and health insurance plans;

(b)  qualifications for and enrollment in public programs;

(c)  qualifications for and enrollment in premium subsidies;

(d)  cultural and linguistic competence;

(e)  conflict of interest standards;

(f)  exchange functions; and

(g)  other requirements that may be adopted by the commissioner by administrative rule.

(5)  This section applies only to applicants who are natural persons.



Enacted by Chapter 341, 2013 General Session

